src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h28_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: bakarí
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: bakarí
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [bakaríi, bakarí]
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: bakarís
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: bakarí
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: bakarí
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: bakaríum
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: bakaría
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: bakaríið
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: bakaríið
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: bakaríinum
    bakarí+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: bakarísins
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: bakaríini
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: bakaríini
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: bakaríunum
    bakarí+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: bakaríanna
